Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.030

Duties of attorney general—Procedure.

The attorney general or an assistant attorney general shall appear and act as counsel for the state. The action shall proceed in all respects as other actions. Appellate review may be sought as in other actions or proceedings, but in case review is sought by the state, no bond shall be required of the appellant.

[ 1988 c 202 s 3; 1986 c 126 s 3; 1971 c 81 s 24; 1895 c 95 s 3; RRS s 888.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.